Utah statutes.
53A-24-204.   Division responsibilities.

DRS may:

(1)  provide vocational rehabilitation services to eligible individuals;

(2)  provide independent living rehabilitation services to eligible individuals;

(3)  cooperate with other public and private agencies to provide services to individuals with  disabilities; and

(4)  perform other duties assigned by the executive director or the board.

